Utah statutes.
75-7-402.   Requirements for creation.

(1)  A trust is created only if:

(a)  the settlor has capacity to create a trust, which standard of capacity shall be the same as for a person to create a will;

(b)  the settlor indicates an intention to create the trust or a statute, judgment, or decree authorizes the creation of a trust;

(c)  the trust has a definite beneficiary or is:

(i)  a charitable trust;

(ii)  a trust for the care of an animal, as provided in Section 75-2-1001; or

(iii)  a trust for a noncharitable purpose, as provided in Section 75-2-1001;

(d)  the trustee has duties to perform; and

(e)  the same person is not the sole trustee and sole beneficiary.

(2)  A beneficiary is definite if the beneficiary can be ascertained now or in the future, subject to any applicable rule against perpetuities.

(3)  A power in a trustee to select a beneficiary from an indefinite class is valid.  If the power is not exercised within a reasonable time, the power fails and the property subject to the power passes to the persons who would have taken the property had the power not been conferred.

